Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.090

Investment of corporate funds—Securities.

A state trust company may invest its nonfiduciary corporate funds in investments other than real estate, including securities, that are permissible for state banks under Title 30A RCW, and as may be made applicable for state trust companies by rule of the director.

[ 2014 c 37 s 311.]